Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-402 Loans to members. A credit
union may make unsecured and secured loans to its members for such purposes and
upon such conditions as the bylaws may provide. The board of directors shall
establish written policies with respect to the granting of loans and the
extending of lines of credit, including the terms, conditions and acceptable
forms of security. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next